Maryland, session 2025, SB0817.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–23.
(a) In this section, “candidate sign” means a sign on behalf of a candidate for
public office or a slate of candidates for public office.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0817*

SENATE BILL 817
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a recorded covenant or
restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision in the bylaws or rules of a cooperative
housing corporation may not prohibit or restrict the display of:
(1) A candidate sign; or
(2) A sign that advertises the support or defeat of any question submitted
to the voters in accordance with the Election Law Article.
(c) A recorded covenant or restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision
in the bylaws or rules of a cooperative housing corporation may restrict the display of a
candidate sign or a sign that advertises the support or defeat of any proposition:
(1) In any areas constituting those portions of a cooperative project
possessed in common by the members;
(2) In accordance with provisions of federal, State, and local law; or
(3) If a limitation to the time period during which signs may be displayed
is not specified by a law governing the jurisdiction in which the cooperative housing
corporation is located, to a time period not less than:
(i) 1. 30 DAYS BEFORE THE START OF EARLY VOTING FOR A
PRIMARY ELECTION, GENERAL ELECTION, OR VOTE ON THE PROPOSITION; OR
2. IF THERE IS NO EARLY VOTING, 30 days before the
primary election, general election, or vote on the proposition; and
(ii) 7 days after the primary election, general election, or vote on the
proposition.
Article – Real Property
11–111.2.
(a) In this section, “candidate sign” means a sign on behalf of a candidate for
public office or a slate of candidates for public office.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a recorded covenant or
restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision in the bylaws or rules of a
condominium may not restrict or prohibit the display of:
(1) A candidate sign; or
(2) A sign that advertises the support or defeat of any question submitted
to voters in accordance with the Election Law Article.

SENATE BILL 817 3
(c) A recorded covenant or restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision
in the bylaws or rules of a condominium may restrict the display of a candidate sign or a
sign that advertises the support or defeat of any proposition:
(1) In the common elements;
(2) In accordance with provisions of federal, State, and local law; or
(3) If a limitation to the time period during which signs may be displayed
is not specified by a law of the jurisdiction in which the condominium is located, to a time
period not less than:
(i) 1. 30 DAYS BEFORE THE START OF EARLY VOTING FOR A
PRIMARY ELECTION, GENERAL ELECTION, OR VOTE ON THE PROPOSITION; OR
2. IF THERE IS NO EARLY VOTING, 30 days before the
primary election, general election, or vote on the proposition; and
(ii) 7 days after the primary election, general election, or vote on the
proposition.
11B–111.2.
(a) In this section, “candidate sign” means a sign on behalf of a candidate for
public office or a slate of candidates for public office.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a recorded covenant or
restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision in the bylaws or rules of a
homeowners association may not restrict or prohibit the display of:
(1) A candidate sign; or
(2) A sign that advertises the support or defeat of any question submitted
to the voters in accordance with the Election Law Article.
(c) A recorded covenant or restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision
in the bylaws or rules of a homeowners association may restrict the display of a candidate
sign or a sign that advertises the support or defeat of any proposition:
(1) In the common areas;
(2) In accordance with provisions of federal, State, and local law; or
(3) If a limitation to the time period during which signs may be displayed
is not specified by a law of the jurisdiction in which the homeowners association is located,
to a time period not less than:

SENATE BILL 817
(i) 1. 30 DAYS BEFORE THE START OF EARLY VOTING FOR A
PRIMARY ELECTION, GENERAL ELECTION, OR VOTE ON THE PROPOSITION; OR
2. IF THERE IS NO EARLY VOTING, 30 days before the
primary election, general election, or vote on the proposition; and
(ii) 7 days after the primary election, general election, or vote on the
proposition.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.